test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kuahca_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:



  Noun - kuáhčá: # á-stems
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Nom: kuáhčá
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Gen: kuávčá
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Acc: kuávčá
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Ill: kuáhčán
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Loc: kuávčást
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Com: kuávččáin
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Abe: kuávčáttáá
    kuáhčá+N+Ess: kuáhčán
    kuáhčá+N+Par: kuáhčád
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Nom: kuávčáh
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Gen: kuávčái
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Acc: kuávčáid
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Ill: kuávččáid
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Loc: kuávčáin
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Com: kuávčáiguin
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Abe: kuávčáittáá
